Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.63.010

Intent.

The primary mission of institutions of higher education is the creation and dissemination of knowledge. Institutions of higher education must be mindful that in providing goods and services for fees, they may be competing with local private businesses.

It is the intent of the legislature to require institutions of higher education to define the legitimate purposes under which commercial activities may be approved, and to establish a mechanism for review of such activities.

[ 1987 c 97 s 1.]